South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3162.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 40-25-40(C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) Members of the commission in subsection (B)(1)(a) through (d) must be appointed by the Governor. Before appointing the member in subsection (B)(1)(d), the Governor shall invite recommendations from the South Carolina Hearing Aid Society, the CommissionDepartment on Aging, the Department of Consumer Affairs, the Department of Education, the Department of Vocational Rehabilitation, the Board of Commissioners of the School for the Deaf and the Blind, and other agencies or organizations which might have knowledge of qualified citizens to serve on the commission. The term of each member is four years. Before a member's term expires the Governor shall appoint a successor to assume his duties at the expiration of the term. A vacancy must be filled in the manner of the original appointment. The members annually shall designate one member as chairman and another as secretary. No member of the commission who has served two or more full terms may be reappointed until at least one year after the expiration of his most recent full term of office. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----